District of Columbia statutes.
4-208.02

Supplemental payments.

The Mayor may authorize a supplemental payment when necessary to meet the needs of its clients, according to established budget standards. A supplemental payment is defined as the 2nd payment to a recipient of public assistance for the same month.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 802, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-208.2.